Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1885.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1 529. School Swimming Education Program.--(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall identify or develop a model curriculum and guidelines for instruction in water and swimming safety for students in grades kindergarten through twelve.(b) The model curriculum and guidelines under this section shall:123456789101112131415161718192021 (1) Be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(2) Be age appropriate.(3) Be made available to all school entities and, upon request, to nonpublic schools.(4) At a minimum, include instruction on:(i) Awareness of water conditions.(ii) Safe behaviors in and around the water.(iii) The proper use of flotation devices.(iv) The importance of avoiding alcohol and substance use with water recreation.(v) Any other subject that the department determines to be appropriate.(c) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity may utilize the model curriculum and guidelines under this section or develop the school entity's own curriculum in accordance with academic standards and consistent with this section. The following apply:(1) The school entity may partner with a local parks and recreation agency to provide access to the necessary water and swimming facilities to implement the curriculum under this section.(2) The school entity may utilize appropriate publicly or privately available materials, personnel and other resources in developing and implementing the curriculum, subject to the requirements of section 111 and 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents).(d) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is initially appropriated from the General Fund to the department 20250HB1885PN2346 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to provide for the implementation, administration and enforcement of this section and for the payments specified under section 2504.5.(e) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement, administer and enforce this section.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2504.5. Payments on Account of School Swimming Education Program.--The Department of Education shall pay each school entity that complies with the school swimming education program established under section 1529, from money appropriated under section 1529 or otherwise appropriated by the General Assembly, an amount to be determined by multiplying the number of pupils who have completed the school swimming education program conducted by the school entity by thirty-five dollars ($35).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1885PN2346 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223